Utah statutes.
20A-11-703.   Criminal penalties -- Fines.

(1)  Within 30 days after a deadline for the filing of any statement required by this part, the lieutenant governor shall review each filed statement to ensure that:

(a)  each corporation that is required to file a statement has filed one; and

(b)  each statement contains the information required by this part.

(2)  If it appears that any corporation has failed to file any statement, if it appears that a filed statement does not conform to the law, or if the lieutenant governor has received a written complaint alleging a violation of the law or the falsity of any statement, the lieutenant governor shall:

(a)  impose a fine against the corporation in accordance with Section 20A-11-1005; and

(b)  within five days of discovery of a violation or receipt of a written complaint, notify the corporation of the violation or written complaint and direct the corporation to file a statement correcting the problem.

(3) (a)  It is unlawful for any corporation to fail to file or amend a statement within 14 days after receiving notice from the lieutenant governor under this section.

(b)  Each corporation that violates Subsection (3)(a) is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

(c)  The lieutenant governor shall report all violations of Subsection (3)(a) to the attorney general.

